Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ADVANCED NUCLEAR STUDY.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Study required. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of commerce must conduct a study evaluating the potential costs, benefits, and impacts of advanced nuclear technology reactor power generation in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) At a minimum, the study must address the potential costs, benefits, and impacts of advanced nuclear technology reactor power generation on: new text end new text begin (1) Minnesota's greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals under the Next Generation Energy Act, Laws 2007, chapter 136; new text end new text begin (2) system costs for ratepayers; new text end new text begin (3) system reliability; new text end new text begin (4) the environment; new text end new text begin (5) local jobs; and new text end new text begin (6) local economic development. new text end new text begin (c) The study must also evaluate: new text end new text begin (1) current Minnesota statutes and administrative rules that would require modifications in order to enable the construction and operation of advanced nuclear reactors; and new text end new text begin (2) the economic feasibility of replacing coal-fired boilers with advanced nuclear reactors, while accounting for the avoided costs that result from the closure of coal-fired plants. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin The commissioner of commerce must submit the results of the study under subdivision 1 to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over energy finance and policy no later than January 31, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of commerce to conduct the study and develop the report under section 1. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end